Wyoming statutes. Title 26 Insurance Code
Article 2. Property and Casualty Insurance Policies

§ 26-35-201.
Scope of article.

This article applies to all property and casualty insurance as defined in W.S.

26-5-104

and

26-5-106

, except this article does not apply to binders and other temporary contracts for temporary insurance provided for under W.S.

26-15-119

or personal lines auto policies.

History.

Laws 1986, ch. 73, § 1; 2004, ch. 57, § 2.

The 2004 amendment,

effective July 1, 2004, deleted “homeowners' policies” following “26-15-119.”

Editor's notes. —

Laws 2004, ch. 57, § 4 provides: “The insurance commissioner may begin the promulgation of rules implementing the provisions of this act upon the effective date of this section.”

Laws 2004, ch. 57, § 6(a), makes § 4 effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 4, 2004.

Applicability. —

Laws 2004, ch. 57, § 5 provides: “The provisions of this act shall apply to insurance policies delivered, issued for delivery or renewed in this state on or after July 1, 2004.”

§ 26-35-202.
Mid-term cancellation; grounds; notice; exception.

An insurance policy or renewal shall not be cancelled by an insurer prior to the expiration of the term stated in the policy, except for any one (1) of the following reasons:

Failure to pay a premium when due;

Material misrepresentation of fact which if known to the company would have caused the company not to issue the policy;

Substantial change in the risk assumed, except to the extent that the insurer should reasonably have foreseen the change or contemplated the risk in writing the policy; or

Substantial breaches of contractual duties, conditions or warranties.

Cancellation under paragraph (a)(i), (iii) or (iv) of this section shall not be effective unless written notice stating the precise reason for cancellation has been made as provided in W.S.

26-35-101

:

Not less than ten (10) days prior to the proposed effective date of cancellation if cancellation is for the reason stated in paragraph (a)(i) of this section; or

Not less than forty-five (45) days prior to the proposed effective date of cancellation in all other cases except paragraph (a)(ii) of this section.

Subsections (a) and (b) of this section do not apply to any insurance policy which has been in effect for less than sixty (60) days and is not a renewal of a previously existing policy for a term longer than sixty (60) days.

If an insurance company loses its reinsurance and the loss threatens the solvency of the company, the company shall:

Continue coverage to the extent of its retention as to each policyholder;

Notify each policyholder of the amount of coverage still present; and

Refund the unearned premium.

History.

Laws 1986, ch. 73, § 1.

§ 26-35-203.
Nonrenewal; notice.

No insurance policy shall be nonrenewed by an insurer except in accordance with the provisions of this section and any nonrenewal attempted which is not in compliance with this section is ineffective.

A policy may be nonrenewed by the insurer at its expiration or anniversary date by giving written notice of nonrenewal as provided in W.S.

26-35-101

, not less than forty-five (45) days, or if the policy is a professional health care malpractice liability policy not less than ninety (90) days, prior to the expiration or anniversary date of the policy.

Any notice of nonrenewal under this section shall state the precise reason for nonrenewal. There shall be no liability on the part of an insurer for stated reasons of nonrenewal given in good faith pursuant to this article.

History.

Laws 1986, ch. 73, § 1; 2005, ch. 145, § 1.

The 2005 amendment,

in (b), inserted “or if the policy is a professional health care malpractice liability policy not less than ninety (90) days.”

Laws 2005, ch. 145, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved February 25, 2005.

§ 26-35-204.
Renewal with altered terms; notice.

If an insurer intends to renew a policy, but on less favorable terms or at higher rates, the insurer shall furnish to the insured and the agent of record, if any, renewal terms and a statement of the amount of premium due for the renewal policy period in accordance with this section.

The renewal terms and statement of premium due shall be given pursuant to W.S.

26-35-101

not less than forty-five (45) days, or if the policy is a professional health care malpractice liability policy not less than ninety (90) days, prior to the expiration or anniversary date of the original policy. For rates regulated pursuant to W.S. 26-14-106(a) and (b), sixty (60) days notice of the renewal terms and premium due shall be required if the insurer notified the insured of its proposed changes at the time the insurer filed with the insurance commissioner.

If the insurer fails to furnish the renewal terms and statement of premium due in the manner required by this section, the insured may elect to cancel the renewal policy within the forty-five (45) day period following receipt of the renewal terms and statement of premium due. Earned premium for any period of coverage shall be calculated pro rata based upon the premium applicable to the original policy and not the premium applicable to the renewal policy.

History.

Laws 1986, ch. 73, § 1; 2005, ch. 145, § 1.

The 2005 amendment,

in (b), inserted “or if the policy is a professional health care malpractice liability policy not less than ninety (90) days,” and added the last sentence.

Laws 2005, ch. 145, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved February 25, 2005.